pt-PT: Tipo de projeto de acessório com contas: Tornozeleira; Cobertura do porta-crachás retrátil; Berloque para saco; Cinto; Marcador de livros; Broche/alfinete; Corrente para óculos; Acessório para o cabelo; Fita para chapéu; Fita de cabeça; Porta-chaves; Lanyard; Corrente para máscara; Berloque/fita para telemóvel; Bolsa/porta-moedas; Acessório para sapato/bota; Puxador de fecho; Outro
el: Τύπος έργου αξεσουάρ με χάντρες: Βραχιόλι ποδιού; Κάλυμμα για καρούλι σήματος; Κρεμαστό τσάντας; Ζώνη; Σελιδοδείκτης; Καρφίτσα/παραμάνα; Αλυσίδα γυαλιών; Αξεσουάρ μαλλιών; Κορδέλα καπέλου; Στέκα/κορδέλα μαλλιών; Μπρελόκ; Κορδόνι λαιμού; Αλυσίδα μάσκας; Κρεμαστό/λουράκι κινητού; Πορτοφόλι/θήκη για κέρματα; Αξεσουάρ για παπούτσια/μπότες; Λαβή φερμουάρ; Άλλο
lt-LT: Karoliukais puoštų aksesuarų projektų tipas: Kulkšnies apyrankė; Ženklelio ritės dangtelis; Krepšio pakabukas; Diržas; Žymelė; Sagė / smeigtukas; Akinių grandinėlė; Plaukų aksesuaras; Skrybėlės juosta; Galvos juosta; Raktų pakabukas; Kaklajuostė; Kaukės grandinėlė; Telefono pakabukas / dirželis; Piniginė / monetų dėklas; Batų aksesuaras; Užtrauktuko pakabukas; Kita
zh-CN: 串珠饰品项目类型: 脚链; 徽章伸缩扣套; 包包挂饰; 腰带; 书签; 胸针/别针; 眼镜链; 发饰; 帽带; 发带; 钥匙扣; 挂绳; 口罩链; 手机挂饰/挂绳; 钱包/零钱包; 鞋/靴配件; 拉链头; 其他
hu: Gyöngyös kiegészítő projekt típusa: Bokalánc; Jelvénytartó borítás; Táskadísz; Öv; Könyvjelző; Melltű/kitűző; Szemüveglánc; Hajdísz; Kalapszalag; Fejpánt; Kulcstartó; Nyakpánt; Maszklánc; Telefondísz/pánt; Pénztárca/aprópénztartó; Cipő-/csizmadísz; Cipzárhúzó; Egyéb
sv: Projekttyp för pärlaccessoarer: Fotlänk; Hölje till passerkortsjojo; Väskberlock; Bälte; Bokmärke; Brosch/nål; Glasögonkedja; Håraccessoar; Hattband; Pannband; Nyckelring; Nyckelband; Munskyddskedja; Mobilberlock/-rem; Börs/myntväska; Sko-/stövelaccessoar; Blixtlåskläpp; Övrigt
vi: Loại dự án phụ kiện đính hạtụ kiện đính hạt: Lắc chân; Vỏ bọc cuộn dây đeo thẻ; Charm treo túi xách; Thắt lưng; Dấu trang; Trâm cài/Ghim cài; Dây đeo kính mắt; Phụ kiện tóc; Ruy băng mũ; Băng đô; Móc khóa; Dây đeo cổ; Dây đeo khẩu trang; Phụ kiện/dây đeo điện thoại; Ví/túi đựng tiền xu; Phụ kiện giày/bốt; Dây kéo khóa; Khác
th: ประเภทงานประดิษฐ์เครื่องประดับจากลูกปัด: สร้อยข้อเท้า; ที่หุ้มสายคล้องบัตร; จี้ห้อยกระเป๋า; เข็มขัด; บุ๊กมาร์ก; เข็มกลัด/พิน; สายคล้องแว่น; เครื่องประดับผม; สายรัดหมวก; ที่คาดผม; พวงกุญแจ; สายคล้องคอ; สายคล้องหน้ากาก; จี้/สายคล้องโทรศัพท์; กระเป๋าเงิน/กระเป๋าใส่เหรียญ; เครื่องประดับรองเท้า/บูท; หัวซิป; อื่นๆ
tr: Boncuklu aksesuar proje tipi: Halhal; Yaka kartı makarası kılıfı; Çanta süsü; Kemer; Kitap ayracı; Broş/iğne; Gözlük zinciri; Saç aksesuarı; Şapka bandı; Saç bandı; Anahtarlık; Boyun askısı; Maske zinciri; Telefon süsü/askısı; Cüzdan/bozuk para cüzdanı; Ayakkabı/çizme aksesuarı; Fermuar tutacağı; Diğer
en: Beaded accessory project type: Anklet; Badge reel cover; Bag charm; Belt; Bookmark; Brooch/pin; Eyeglass chain; Hair accessory; Hat band; Headband; Keychain; Lanyard; Mask chain; Phone charm/strap; Purse/coin pouch; Shoe/boot accessory; Zipper pull; Other
sk-SK: Typ projektu s korálkovým doplnkom: Náramok na nohu; Kryt na navíjacie puzdro na odznak; Prívesok na tašku; Opasok; Záložka; Brošňa/špendlík; Retiazka na okuliare; Doplnok do vlasov; Pásik na klobúk; Čelenka; Kľúčenka; Šnúrka na krk; Retiazka na masku; Prívesok/remienok na telefón; Kabelka/peňaženka na mince; Doplnok na topánky/čižmy; Ťahač zipsu; Iné
ja: ビーズアクセサリーのプロジェクトタイプ: アンクレット; バッジリールカバー; バッグチャーム; ベルト; ブックマーク; ブローチ/ピン; メガネチェーン; ヘアアクセサリー; ハットバンド; ヘッドバンド; キーホルダー; ランヤード; マスクチェーン; 携帯用チャーム/ストラップ; 財布/コインケース; シューズ/ブーツアクセサリー; ジッパープル; その他
nb: Prosjekttype for perletilbehør: Ankelkjede; Deksel til merkesnelle; Veskeanheng; Belte; Bokmerke; Brosje/nål; Brillesnor; Hårtilbehør; Hattebånd; Hårbånd; Nøkkelring; Nøkkelbånd; Maskesnor; Telefonanheng/-stropp; Veske/myntpung; Sko-/støveltilbehør; Glidelåsdrager; Annet
es: Tipo de proyecto de accesorio con cuentas: Tobillera; Cubierta de carrete para emblema; Dije para bolso; Cinturón; Marcapáginas; Broche/pin; Cadena para gafas; Accesorio para el cabello; Cinta para sombrero; Diadema; Llavero; Cordón; Cadena para mascarilla; Dije/correa para teléfono; Monedero/bolsa para monedas; Accesorio para zapatos/botas; Tirador de cremallera; Otro
bg-BG: Тип проект за аксесоари с мъниста: Гривна за глезен; Калъф за макара за значка; Талисман за чанта; Колан; Отметка; Брошка/игла; Верижка за очила; Аксесоар за коса; Лента за шапка; Лента за глава; Ключодържател; Лента за врат; Верижка за маска; Талисман/каишка за телефон; Портмоне/калъф за монети; Аксесоар за обувки/ботуши; Държач за цип; Друго
ro-RO: Tip de proiect pentru accesorii cu mărgele: Brățară de picior; Capac de rolă pentru ecuson; Talisman pentru geantă; Curea; Semn de carte; Broșă/Ac; Lănțișor pentru ochelari; Accesoriu de păr; Bandă pentru pălărie; Bentiță; Breloc; Șnur; Lănțișor pentru mască; Talisman/Șnur pentru telefon; Poșetă/Portofel de monede; Accesoriu pentru pantofi/cizme; Cheiță de fermoar; Altele
zh-TW: 串珠飾品項目類型: 腳鍊; 伸縮識別證夾裝飾; 包包吊飾; 腰帶; 書籤; 胸針/別針; 眼鏡鍊; 髮飾; 帽帶; 髮箍/髮帶; 鑰匙圈; 頸帶/掛繩; 口罩鍊; 手機吊飾/掛繩; 錢包/零錢包; 鞋/靴子配件; 拉鍊拉頭; 其他
it: Progetto di accessorio con perline: Cavigliera; Copertura per portabadge estensibile; Ciondolo per borsa; Cintura; Segnalibro; Spilla; Catenella per occhiali; Accessorio per capelli; Fascia da cappello; Fascia per capelli; Portachiavi; Cordino; Catenella per mascherina; Ciondolo/cinturino per telefono; Borsetta/portamonete; Accessorio per scarpe/stivali; Tiretto per cerniera; Altro
pt-BR: Tipo de projeto do acessório com contas/miçangas: Tornozeleira; Capa de porta-crachá retrátil; Enfeite de bolsa; Cinto; Marcador de página; Broche; Corrente de óculos; Acessório de cabelo; Faixa de chapéu; Tiara; Chaveiro; Cordão; Corrente para máscara; Enfeite/alça para celular; Bolsa/porta-moedas; Acessório para sapato/bota; Puxador de zíper; Outros
fr: Type de projet d’accessoire en perles: Bracelet de cheville; Couvre-enrouleur de badge; Bijou de sac; Ceinture; Marque-page; Broche/épingle; Chaîne de lunettes; Accessoire pour cheveux; Bandeau de chapeau; Bandeau; Porte-clés; Tour de cou; Chaîne de masque; Bijou/dragonne de téléphone; Porte-monnaie/bourse; Accessoire pour chaussure/botte; Tirette de fermeture éclair; Autre
cs: Typ projektu korálkových doplňků: Náramek na kotník; Kryt na naviják na odznak; Přívěsek na tašku; Pásek; Záložka; Brož/špendlík; Řetízek na brýle; Doplněk do vlasů; Pásek na klobouk; Čelenka; Klíčenka; Šňůrka na krk; Řetízek na roušku; Přívěsek/řemínek na telefon; Kabelka / peněženka na mince; Doplněk na boty; Táhlo zipu; Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta projekta z nakitnimi dodatki: Zapestnica za gleženj; Pokrov za držalo za priponko; Obesek za torbo; Pas; Zaznamek; Broška/značka; Verižica za očala; Dodatek za lase; Trak za klobuk; Trak za lase; Obesek za ključe; Trak za okoli vratu; Verižica za masko; Obesek/trak za telefon; Torbica/mošnja za kovance; Dodatek za čevlje/škornje; Obesek za zadrgo; Drugo
de: Typ des Perlenschmuckprojekts: Fußkettchen; Ausweisrollen-Hülle; Taschenanhänger; Gürtel; Lesezeichen; Brosche/Anstecknadel; Brillenkette; Haar-Accessoire; Hutband; Stirnband; Schlüsselanhänger; Lanyard; Maskenkette; Handy-Anhänger/-Schlaufe; Geldbörse/Münztasche; Schuh-/Stiefel-Accessoire; Reißverschlussanhänger; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta projekta dodatka od perlica: Narukvica za gležanj; Navlaka za držač za značke; Privjesak za torbu; Remen; Straničnik; Broš/igla; Lančić za naočale; Dodatak za kosu; Traka za šešir; Traka za kosu; Privjesak za ključeve; Vrpca za nošenje; Lančić za masku; Privjesak/vrpca za mobitel; Torbica/novčanik za kovanice; Dodatak za cipele/čizme; Potezač patentnog zatvarača; Ostalo
fi: Helmiasusteprojektin tyyppi: Nilkkakoru; Tunnuskelan suojus; Laukkukoru; Vyö; Kirjanmerkki; Rintaneula/pinssi; Silmälasivitjat; Hiuskoru; Hattunauha; Hiuspanta; Avaimenperä; Avainnauha; Maskiketju; Puhelinkoru/-hihna; Kukkaro/kolikkopussi; Kengän/saappaan koriste; Vetoketjun vedin; Muu
pl: Typ projektu akcesorium z koralików: Bransoletka na kostkę; Osłona rolki na identyfikator; Zawieszka do torby; Pasek; Zakładka; Broszka/przypinka; Łańcuszek do okularów; Akcesorium do włosów; Opaska na kapelusz; Opaska na głowę; Brelok; Smycz; Łańcuszek do maseczki; Zawieszka/pasek do telefonu; Torebka/portmonetka; Akcesorium do butów; Zawieszka do zamka; Inne
ru: Тип проекта аксессуара из бисера: Браслет на ногу; Чехол для рулетки бейджа; Брелок на сумку; Пояс; Закладка; Брошь/булавка; Цепочка для очков; Аксессуар для волос; Лента для шляпы; Ободок; Брелок; Ланьярд; Цепочка для маски; Брелок/ремешок для телефона; Кошелек/монетница; Аксессуар для туфель/ботинок; Пуллер для молнии; Другое
da: Projekttype for tilbehør med perler: Ankelkæde; Skjuler til badge-yoyo; Taskevedhæng; Bælte; Bogmærke; Broche/nål; Brillesnor; Hårtilbehør; Hattebånd; Pandebånd; Nøglering; Nøglesnor; Mundbindssnor; Telefonvedhæng/-strop; Pung/møntpung; Sko-/støvletilbehør; Lynlåsvedhæng; Andet
nl: Kralenaccessoire projecttype: Enkelbandje; Badgehouderhoesje; Tasbedel; Riem; Bladwijzer; Broche/speld; Brillenkoord; Haaraccessoire; Hoedenband; Haarband; Sleutelhanger; Keykoord; Maskerkoord; Telefoonbedel/-koord; Portemonnee/muntzakje; Schoen-/laarsaccessoire; Ritstrekker; Overig
ko: 비즈 액세서리 프로젝트 유형: 발찌; 배지 릴 커버; 가방 참; 벨트; 북마크; 브로치/핀; 안경 체인; 헤어 액세서리; 모자 밴드; 머리띠; 키체인; 랜야드; 마스크 체인; 폰 참/스트랩; 지갑/동전 파우치; 신발/부츠 액세서리; 지퍼 손잡이; 기타